Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5382YC (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 232.96A, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 6. The child is in need of treatment to cure or alleviate a 3 serious chemical dependency or mental illness or disorder, or 4 emotional damage as evidenced by severe anxiety, depression, 5 withdrawal, or behavioral health disorder that compromises the 6 childâs safety or causes untoward aggressive behavior toward 7 the childâs self or others in the household or the childâs 8 community, and the childâs parent, guardian, or custodian is 9 unwilling or unable to provide such treatment or the parentâs, 10 guardianâs, or custodianâs efforts to secure needed treatment 11 have been exhausted and unsuccessful . 12 Sec. 2. Section 232.96A, subsection 13, Code 2026, is 13 amended by striking the subsection. 14